Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.280

Return of parole violators from another state—Deputizing out-of-state officers.

The secretary, upon recommendation by the board, may deputize any person (regularly employed by another state) to act as an officer and agent of this state in effecting the return of any person convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984, who has violated the terms and conditions of parole or probation as granted by this state. In any matter relating to the return of such a person, any agent so deputized shall have all the powers of a police officer of this state.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 20; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 344; 1999 c 143 s 31; 1955 c 183 s 1.]

NOTES:

Application—Recalculation of community custody terms—2011 1st sp.s. c 40: See note following RCW 9.94A.501.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.